Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2212
Civil action; injunctive relief; authorized.

Any person aggrieved as a result of a violation of section 48-2209 or 48-2210 or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto may file suit in any district court of this state. If the court finds that the respondent has intentionally violated section 48-2209 or 48-2210 or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto, the court may award damages up to and including an amount equal to the original damages and provide injunctive relief.

Laws 1995, LB 20, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 48-2206;

Laws 2003, LB 418, § 6.